Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 4. HEALTH FACILITIES

SUBTITLE A. FINANCING, CONSTRUCTING, REGULATING, AND INSPECTING

HEALTH FACILITIES

CHAPTER 224. POLICY ON VACCINE PREVENTABLE DISEASES

Sec. 224.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Covered individual" means:

(A) an employee of the health care facility;

(B) an individual providing direct patient care under a contract with a health care facility; or

(C) an individual to whom a health care facility has granted privileges to provide direct patient care.

(2) "Health care facility" means:

(A) a facility licensed under Subtitle B, including a hospital as defined by Section 241.003; or

(B) a hospital maintained or operated by this state.

(3) "Regulatory authority" means a state agency that regulates a health care facility under this code.

(4) "Vaccine preventable diseases" means the diseases included in the most current recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 224.002. VACCINE PREVENTABLE DISEASES POLICY REQUIRED. (a) Each health care facility shall develop and implement a policy to protect its patients from vaccine preventable diseases.

(b) The policy must:

(1) require covered individuals to receive vaccines for the vaccine preventable diseases specified by the facility based on the level of risk the individual presents to patients by the individual's routine and direct exposure to patients;

(2) specify the vaccines a covered individual is required to receive based on the level of risk the individual presents to patients by the individual's routine and direct exposure to patients;

(3) include procedures for verifying whether a covered individual has complied with the policy;

(4) include procedures for a covered individual to be exempt from the required vaccines for the medical conditions identified as contraindications or precautions by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;

(5) for a covered individual who is exempt from the required vaccines, include procedures the individual must follow to protect facility patients from exposure to disease, such as the use of protective medical equipment, such as gloves and masks, based on the level of risk the individual presents to patients by the individual's routine and direct exposure to patients;

(6) prohibit discrimination or retaliatory action against a covered individual who is exempt from the required vaccines for the medical conditions identified as contraindications or precautions by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, except that required use of protective medical equipment, such as gloves and masks, may not be considered retaliatory action for purposes of this subdivision;

(7) require the health care facility to maintain a written or electronic record of each covered individual's compliance with or exemption from the policy; and

(8) include disciplinary actions the health care facility is authorized to take against a covered individual who fails to comply with the policy.

(c) The policy may include procedures for a covered individual to be exempt from the required vaccines based on reasons of conscience, including a religious belief.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 224.003. DISASTER EXEMPTION. (a) In this section, "public health disaster" has the meaning assigned by Section 81.003.

(b) During a public health disaster, a health care facility may prohibit a covered individual who is exempt from the vaccines required in the policy developed by the facility under Section 224.002 from having contact with facility patients.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 224.004. DISCIPLINARY ACTION. A health care facility that violates this chapter is subject to an administrative or civil penalty in the same manner, and subject to the same procedures, as if the facility had violated a provision of this code that specifically governs the facility.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 224.005. RULES. The appropriate rulemaking authority for each regulatory authority shall adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 7), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 28, 2011.